Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 11 TLSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of administrative services for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 4 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 8 equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,713,718 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 55.30 11 b. For the payment of utility costs, and for not more than 12 the following full-time equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,487,598 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 15 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 16 for utility costs in this lettered paragraph that remain 17 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 18 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 19 for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding 20 fiscal year. 21 c. For Terrace Hill operations, and for not more than the 22 following full-time equivalent positions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 460,884 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.37 25 d. For state library services: 26 (1) For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 27 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 28 equivalent positions: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,626,613 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 20.00 31 (2) For the enrich Iowa program established under section 32 8A.209: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,464,823 34 e. (1) For support of the stateâs historical resources, and 35 -1- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 1/ 19 S.F. _____ for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,804,774 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 37.99 3 (2) The department shall coordinate historical and cultural 4 activities with the tourism office of the economic development 5 authority to promote attendance at the state historical 6 building and at the stateâs historic sites. 7 f. For administration and support of the stateâs historic 8 sites, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 9 positions: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,751 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.00 12 2. Any moneys and premiums collected by the department 13 for workersâ compensation shall be segregated into a separate 14 workersâ compensation fund in the state treasury to be used 15 for payment of state employeesâ workersâ compensation claims 16 and administrative costs. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 17 unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining in this workersâ 18 compensation fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not 19 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes 20 of the fund in subsequent fiscal years. 21 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ 22 REVOLVING FUNDS. There is appropriated to the department of 23 administrative services for the fiscal year beginning July 24 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, from the revolving funds 25 designated in chapter 8A and from internal service funds 26 created by the department such amounts as the department deems 27 necessary for the operation of the department consistent with 28 the requirements of chapter 8A . 29 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ STATE 30 EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION CHARGE. For the 31 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 32 the monthly per contract administrative charge which may be 33 assessed by the department of administrative services shall be 34 $2.00 per contract on all health insurance plans administered 35 -2- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 2/ 19 S.F. _____ by the department. 1 Sec. 4. AUDITOR OF STATE. 2 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 3 to the office of the auditor of state for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 5 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 8 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 9 equivalent positions: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,002,686 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 98.00 12 2. The auditor of state may retain additional full-time 13 equivalent positions as is reasonable and necessary to 14 perform governmental subdivision audits which are reimbursable 15 pursuant to section 11.20 or 11.21 , to perform audits which are 16 requested by and reimbursable from the federal government, and 17 to perform work requested by and reimbursable from departments 18 or agencies pursuant to section 11.5A or 11.5B . The auditor 19 of state shall notify the department of management, the 20 legislative fiscal committee, and the legislative services 21 agency of the additional full-time equivalent positions 22 retained. 23 3. The auditor of state shall allocate moneys from the 24 appropriations in this section solely for audit work related to 25 the annual comprehensive financial report, federally required 26 audits, and investigations of embezzlement, theft, or other 27 significant financial irregularities until the audit of the 28 annual comprehensive financial report is complete. 29 Sec. 5. IOWA ETHICS AND CAMPAIGN DISCLOSURE BOARD. There 30 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 31 Iowa ethics and campaign disclosure board for the fiscal year 32 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 33 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 34 purposes designated: 35 -3- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 3/ 19 S.F. _____ For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 1 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 2 equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 897,151 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 7.00 5 Sec. 6. GOVERNOR AND LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR. There is 6 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the offices 7 of the governor and the lieutenant governor for the fiscal year 8 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 9 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 10 purposes designated: 11 1. GENERAL OFFICE 12 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 13 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 14 equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,864,932 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 25.00 17 2. TERRACE HILL QUARTERS 18 For the governorâs quarters at Terrace Hill, including 19 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and 20 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 144,222 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.93 23 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND 24 LICENSING. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 25 state to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 26 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 27 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 28 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 29 1. ADMINISTRATION DIVISION 30 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 32 equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 933,285 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 11.55 35 -4- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 4/ 19 S.F. _____ 2. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS DIVISION 1 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 3 equivalent positions: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 654,983 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 23.00 6 3. INVESTIGATIONS 7 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 8 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 9 equivalent positions: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,769,231 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 56.00 12 b. By December 1, 2025, the department shall submit a 13 report to the general assembly concerning the departmentâs 14 activities relative to fraud in public assistance programs 15 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 16 30, 2025. The report shall include but is not limited to a 17 summary of the number of cases investigated, case outcomes, 18 overpayment dollars identified, amount of cost avoidance, and 19 actual dollars recovered. 20 4. HEALTH FACILITIES 21 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 23 equivalent positions: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,206,128 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 132.00 26 b. The department shall make all of the following 27 information available to the public as part of the departmentâs 28 development efforts to revise the departmentâs internet site: 29 (1) The number of inspections of health facilities 30 conducted by the department annually by type of service 31 provider and type of inspection. 32 (2) The total annual operations budget for the department 33 that is associated with health facilities regulation, including 34 general fund appropriations and federal contract dollars 35 -5- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 5/ 19 S.F. _____ received by type of service provider inspected. 1 (3) The total number of full-time equivalent positions 2 in the department that are associated with health facilities 3 regulation, to include the number of full-time equivalent 4 positions serving in a supervisory capacity, and serving as 5 surveyors, inspectors, or monitors in the field by type of 6 service provider inspected. 7 (4) Identification of state and federal survey trends, 8 cited regulations, the scope and severity of deficiencies 9 identified, and federal and state fines assessed and collected 10 concerning nursing and assisted living facilities and programs. 11 c. It is the intent of the general assembly that the 12 department continuously solicit input from health facilities 13 regulated by the department to assess and improve the 14 departmentâs level of collaboration and to identify new 15 opportunities for cooperation. 16 5. EMPLOYMENT APPEAL BOARD 17 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 19 equivalent positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 530,782 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 12.50 22 b. The employment appeal board shall be reimbursed by the 23 department for all costs associated with hearings conducted 24 under chapter 91C related to contractor registration. The 25 board may expend, in addition to the amount appropriated under 26 this subsection, additional amounts as are directly billable 27 to the department under this subsection and to retain the 28 additional full-time equivalent positions as needed to conduct 29 hearings required pursuant to chapter 91C . 30 c. The employment appeal board may temporarily exceed and 31 draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection and 32 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 33 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 34 and the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded 35 -6- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 6/ 19 S.F. _____ at the close of the fiscal year. 1 6. FOOD AND CONSUMER SAFETY 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 3 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 4 equivalent positions: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 509,565 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 33.75 7 7. IOWA OFFICE OF CIVIL RIGHTS 8 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,385,921 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 27.00 13 b. The Iowa office of civil rights may enter into a contract 14 with a nonprofit organization to provide legal assistance to 15 resolve civil rights complaints. 16 8. LABOR SERVICES 17 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 19 equivalent positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,965,719 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 50.00 22 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 23 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 24 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 25 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 26 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 27 9. DIVISION OF WORKERSâ COMPENSATION 28 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 30 equivalent positions: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,381,044 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 26.10 33 b. The division of workersâ compensation shall charge a 34 $100 filing fee for workersâ compensation cases. The filing 35 -7- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 7/ 19 S.F. _____ fee shall be paid by the petitioner of a claim. However, 1 the fee can be taxed as a cost and paid by the losing party, 2 except in cases where it would impose an undue hardship or be 3 unjust under the circumstances. The moneys generated by the 4 filing fee allowed under this paragraph are appropriated to 5 the department to be used for purposes of administering the 6 division of workersâ compensation. 7 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 8 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 9 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 10 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 11 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 12 10. PROFESSIONAL LICENSING 13 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 15 equivalent positions: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,627,969 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 139.00 18 11. APPROPRIATION REALLOCATION 19 Notwithstanding section 8.39 , the department of inspections, 20 appeals, and licensing, in consultation with the department of 21 management, may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 22 as necessary to best fulfill the needs of the department 23 of inspections, appeals, and licensing provided for in the 24 appropriation. However, the department of inspections, 25 appeals, and licensing shall not reallocate moneys appropriated 26 for labor services or the division of workersâ compensation. 27 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 28 ââ LICENSE OR REGISTRATION FEES. 29 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 30 June 30, 2026, the department of inspections, appeals, and 31 licensing shall collect any license or registration fees or 32 electronic transaction fees generated during the fiscal year 33 as a result of licensing and registration activities under 34 chapters 99B , 137C , 137D , and 137F . 35 -8- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 8/ 19 S.F. _____ 2. From the fees collected by the department under this 1 section on behalf of a municipal corporation with which 2 the department has an agreement pursuant to section 137F.3 , 3 through a statewide electronic licensing system operated by 4 the department, notwithstanding section 137F.6, subsection 2 , 5 the department shall remit the amount of those fees to the 6 municipal corporation for whom the fees were collected less 7 any electronic transaction fees collected by the department to 8 enable electronic payment. 9 3. From the fees collected by the department under this 10 section, other than those fees described in subsection 2, 11 the department shall deposit the amount of $800,000 into the 12 general fund of the state prior to June 30, 2026. 13 4. From the fees collected by the department under this 14 section, other than those fees described in subsections 2 and 15 3, the department shall retain the remainder of the fees for 16 the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 137C , 17 137D , and 137F . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys retained 18 by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain 19 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 20 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 21 for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 22 137C , 137D , and 137F during the succeeding fiscal year. The 23 department shall provide an annual report to the department 24 of management and the legislative services agency on fees 25 billed and collected and expenditures from the moneys retained 26 by the department in a format determined by the department 27 of management in consultation with the legislative services 28 agency. 29 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 30 ââ HOUSING TRUST FUND. There is appropriated from the housing 31 trust fund created in section 16.181 to the department of 32 inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 33 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 34 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 35 -9- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 9/ 19 S.F. _____ purposes designated: 1 For professional licensing salaries, support, maintenance, 2 and miscellaneous purposes: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62,317 4 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 5 ââ RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION ââ RACING AND GAMING 6 REGULATION. There is appropriated from the gaming regulatory 7 revolving fund established in section 99F.20 to the racing and 8 gaming commission of the department of inspections, appeals, 9 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 10 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 11 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 12 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 13 purposes for regulation, administration, and enforcement of 14 pari-mutuel racetracks, excursion boat gambling, gambling 15 structure laws, sports wagering, and fantasy sports contests, 16 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 17 positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,448,600 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 53.70 20 Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 21 ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There is appropriated from the road 22 use tax fund created in section 312.1 to the administrative 23 hearings division of the department of inspections, appeals, 24 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 25 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 26 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 27 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 28 purposes: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623,897 30 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES 31 ââ COMMERCE REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the 32 commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to the 33 department of insurance and financial services for the fiscal 34 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 35 -10- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 10/ 19 S.F. _____ following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 1 used for the purposes designated: 2 1. BANKING DIVISION 3 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 5 equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,343,523 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 79.00 8 2. CREDIT UNION DIVISION 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,875,989 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 16.00 14 3. INSURANCE DIVISION 15 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 16 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 17 equivalent positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,326,541 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 131.85 20 b. From the full-time equivalent positions authorized 21 in this subsection, the insurance division shall use 2.00 22 full-time equivalent positions for two fraud investigators. 23 c. The insurance division shall use 1.00 full-time 24 equivalent position authorized in this subsection for an 25 employee whose sole responsibility is investigating complaints 26 and notifications related to financial exploitation of eligible 27 adults. 28 d. Except as provided in paragraphs âbâ and âcâ, the 29 insurance division may reallocate authorized full-time 30 equivalent positions as necessary to respond to accreditation 31 recommendations or requirements. 32 e. The insurance division expenditures for examination 33 purposes may exceed the projected receipts, refunds, and 34 reimbursements, estimated pursuant to section 505.7, subsection 35 -11- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 11/ 19 S.F. _____ 7, including the expenditures for retention of additional 1 personnel, if the expenditures are fully reimbursable and the 2 division first does all of the following: 3 (1) Notifies the department of management, the legislative 4 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 5 need for the expenditures. 6 (2) Files with each of the entities named in subparagraph 7 (1) the legislative and regulatory justification for the 8 expenditures, along with an estimate of the expenditures. 9 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES ââ 10 GENERAL FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of 11 the state to the department of insurance and financial services 12 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 13 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 14 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 15 For deposit in the captive insurance regulatory and 16 supervision fund created in section 521J.12 for use as provided 17 in section 521J.12, including salaries, support, maintenance, 18 and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 19 full-time equivalent positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.00 22 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated 23 from the general fund of the state to the department of 24 management for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 25 ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof 26 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 27 1. For enterprise resource planning, providing for a 28 salary model administrator, conducting performance audits, the 29 departmentâs LEAN process, and criminal and juvenile justice 30 planning; for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes; and for not more than the following full-time 32 equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,666,154 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 29.00 35 -12- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 12/ 19 S.F. _____ 2. For the division of information technology; for 1 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 2 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,421,887 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 24.39 5 Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $325,000 6 is allocated to providing cybersecurity services to local 7 governments. 8 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 9 ââ REVOLVING AND INTERNAL FUNDS. 10 1. There is appropriated to the department of management 11 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 12 30, 2026, from the revolving funds designated in chapter 8, 13 subchapter XI , and from internal service funds created under 14 section 8.92, such amounts as the department deems necessary 15 for the operation of the department pursuant to and consistent 16 with the requirements of chapter 8, subchapter XI . 17 2. a. Notwithstanding section 321A.3, subsection 1 , for the 18 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 19 the first $750,000 collected and transferred to the treasurer 20 of state with respect to the fees for transactions involving 21 the furnishing of a certified abstract of a vehicle operating 22 record under section 321A.3, subsection 1 , shall be transferred 23 to the IowAccess revolving fund created in section 8.90 for 24 the purposes of developing, implementing, maintaining, and 25 expanding electronic access to government records as provided 26 by law. 27 b. All fees collected with respect to transactions 28 involving IowAccess shall be deposited in the IowAccess 29 revolving fund created under section 8.90 and shall be used 30 only for the support of IowAccess projects. 31 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ ROAD USE TAX 32 FUND. There is appropriated from the road use tax fund created 33 in section 312.1 to the department of management for the fiscal 34 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 35 -13- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 13/ 19 S.F. _____ following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 1 used for the purposes designated: 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 3 purposes: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 56,000 5 Sec. 17. IPERS ââ GENERAL OFFICE. There is appropriated 6 from the Iowa public employeesâ retirement fund created in 7 section 97B.7 to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system 8 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 9 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 10 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 11 1. For salaries, support, maintenance, and other 12 operational purposes to pay the costs of the Iowa public 13 employeesâ retirement system, and for not more than the 14 following full-time equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,955,503 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 104.00 17 2. a. For a pension administrative system: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 60,000,000 19 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 20 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 21 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 22 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 23 close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2035. 24 Sec. 18. IOWA PUBLIC INFORMATION BOARD. There is 25 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the Iowa 26 public information board for the fiscal year beginning July 27 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or 28 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 29 designated: 30 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 32 equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 363,227 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 3.20 35 -14- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 14/ 19 S.F. _____ Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 3 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 4 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 8 equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,378,678 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 166.66 11 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, the 12 department shall use $400,000 to pay the direct costs of 13 compliance related to the collection and distribution of local 14 sales and services taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 423B . 15 2. The director of revenue shall prepare and issue a state 16 appraisal manual and the revisions to the state appraisal 17 manual as provided in section 421.17, subsection 17 , without 18 cost to a city or county. 19 Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE ââ MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX 20 FUND. There is appropriated from the motor vehicle fuel tax 21 fund created pursuant to section 452A.77 to the department of 22 revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 23 June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 24 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 25 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 26 purposes, and for administration and enforcement of the 27 provisions of chapter 452A and the motor vehicle fuel tax 28 program: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,305,775 30 Sec. 21. SECRETARY OF STATE. There is appropriated from 31 the general fund of the state to the office of the secretary of 32 state for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 33 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 34 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 35 -15- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 15/ 19 S.F. _____ 1. ADMINISTRATION AND ELECTIONS 1 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 2 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 3 equivalent positions: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,566,697 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 19.25 6 b. The state department or agency that provides data 7 processing services to support voter registration file 8 maintenance and storage shall provide those services without 9 charge. 10 2. BUSINESS SERVICES 11 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 12 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 13 equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568,795 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 16.75 16 Sec. 22. SECRETARY OF STATE ââ ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY 17 PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the address 18 confidentiality program revolving fund created in section 9.8 19 to the office of the secretary of state for the fiscal year 20 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 21 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 22 purposes designated: 23 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,400 26 Sec. 23. SECRETARY OF STATE FILING FEES REFUND. 27 Notwithstanding the obligation to collect fees pursuant to the 28 provisions of section 489.122, subsection 1 , paragraphs âcâ and 29 âsâ, section 490.122, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, and section 30 504.113, subsection 1 , paragraphs âaâ, âcâ, âdâ, âjâ, âkâ, 31 âlâ, and âmâ, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the 32 secretary of state may refund these fees to the filer pursuant 33 to rules established by the secretary of state. The decision 34 of the secretary of state not to issue a refund under rules 35 -16- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 16/ 19 S.F. _____ established by the secretary of state is final and not subject 1 to review pursuant to chapter 17A . 2 Sec. 24. TREASURER OF STATE. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 4 state to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 5 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 6 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 7 purposes designated: 8 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,046,415 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 26.00 13 2. The office of treasurer of state shall supply 14 administrative support for the executive council. 15 Sec. 25. TREASURER OF STATE ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There 16 is appropriated from the road use tax fund created in section 17 312.1 to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 18 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 19 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 20 purposes designated: 21 For enterprise resource management costs related to the 22 distribution of road use tax fund moneys: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 316,788 24 Sec. 26. IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION. 25 1. There is appropriated from the commerce revolving fund 26 created in section 546.12 to the Iowa utilities commission for 27 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 28 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 29 to be used for the purposes designated: 30 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 32 equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,659,071 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 80.00 35 -17- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 17/ 19 S.F. _____ 2. The utilities commission may expend additional moneys, 1 including moneys for additional personnel, if those additional 2 expenditures are actual expenses which exceed the moneys 3 budgeted for utility regulation and the expenditures are fully 4 reimbursable. Before the commission expends or encumbers an 5 amount in excess of the moneys budgeted for regulation, the 6 commission shall first do all of the following: 7 a. Notify the department of management, the legislative 8 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 9 need for the expenditures. 10 b. File with each of the entities named in paragraph âaâ the 11 legislative and regulatory justification for the expenditures, 12 along with an estimate of the expenditures. 13 Sec. 27. CHARGES ââ IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION AND 14 DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES. The Iowa 15 utilities commission and each division of the department of 16 insurance and financial services shall include in its charges 17 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 18 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 19 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 20 services. 21 Sec. 28. IOWA PRODUCTS. As a condition of receiving an 22 appropriation, any agency appropriated moneys pursuant to this 23 Act shall give first preference when purchasing a product to an 24 Iowa product or a product produced by an Iowa-based business. 25 Second preference shall be given to a United States product or 26 a product produced by a business based in the United States. 27 Sec. 29. LIMITATION OF STANDING APPROPRIATION. 28 Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the following 29 designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 30 and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the 31 general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 32 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 33 amount: 34 For the enforcement of chapter 453D relating to tobacco 35 -18- LSB 1000XC (8) 91 sc/ns 18/ 19 S.F. _____ product manufacturers under section 453D.8 : 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,525 2